Hawaii statutes.
§188-68 Permits for coral and rock with
marine life attached. The department may issue permits, as authorized by
this section, section 187A-6, chapter 183C, or under rules adopted pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary for collecting live stony corals or marine life visibly
attached to rocks placed in the water for a commercial purpose. [L 1988, c 374,
§1; am L 1990, c 69, §2; am L 1991, c 184, §4; am L 1993, c 256, §3; am L 1995,
c 11, §7 and c 69, §5; am L 1999, c 85, §§4, 17; am L 2002, c 151, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next